Arkansas, session 2025, HB1432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-15-204(a), concerning a hearing held on a
petition for an order of protection, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(3) If the court lacks jurisdiction to rule on a petition under
§ 9-15-201, the court may dismiss a petition for an order of protection
through a written order that specifies the basis for the lack of
jurisdiction.

/s/Moore




*LJH134*
02-17-2025 09:15:43 LJH134